Nebraska, session 109, LB1174.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1174 LB1174
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 8-2701, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
8-2701 Sections 8-2701 to 8-2742 and section 3 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
Sec. 2. Section 8-2718, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
8-2718 (1) Each licensee shall submit a report of condition within
forty-five days after the end of a calendar quarter, or within any
extended time as the director may prescribe.
(2) The report of condition shall include:
(a) Financial information at the licensee level;
(b) Nationwide and state-specific money transmission transaction
information in every jurisdiction in the United States where the licensee
is licensed to engage in money transmission;
(c) A permissible investments report of the licensee;
(d) Transaction destination country reporting for money received for
transmission, if applicable including: ; and
(i) The amount of transactions to all foreign countries that are not
foreign adversary countries as defined in section 3 of this act and the
estimated amount of the remittance transfer tax imposed under section 3
of this act collected for such transactions; and
(ii) The amount of transactions to all foreign adversary countries
as defined in section 3 of this act and the estimated amount of the
remittance transfer tax imposed under section 3 of this act collected on
such transactions; and
(e) Any other information the director reasonably requires with
respect to the licensee.
(3) The director is authorized to utilize the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry for the submission of the report required
by this section and is authorized to update as necessary the requirements
of this section to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Money
-2-

LB1174 LB1174
2026 2026
Transmitters Act and maintain consistency with Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry reporting.
(4) The information required by subdivision (2)(d) of this section
shall only be included in a report of condition submitted within forty-
five days after the end of the fourth calendar quarter.
Sec. 3. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Active duty member of the armed forces means a person who is a
member of the armed forces of the United States on active duty as defined
in 10 U.S.C. 101(d)(1), as such section existed on January 1, 2026, or a
member of the Nebraska National Guard in active service of the state;
(b) Dependent means a spouse or any other person for whom an active
duty member of the armed forces provided more than one-half of that
person's support during the previous calendar year;
(c) Designated recipient has the same meaning as in section 919 of
the Electronic Fund Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C. 1693o–1, as such section
existed on January 1, 2026;
(d) Foreign adversary country means any country listed in 15 C.F.R.
791.4, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2026;
(e) Remittance transfer has the same meaning as in section 919 of
the Electronic Fund Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C. 1693o–1, as such section
existed on January 1, 2026;
(f) Remittance transfer provider has the same meaning as in section
919 of the Electronic Fund Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C. 1693o-1, as such
section existed on January 1, 2026; and
(g) Sender has the same meaning as in section 919 of the Electronic
Fund Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C. 1693o–1, as such section existed on January
1, 2026.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section,
there is hereby imposed an excise tax of two percent on any remittance
transfer by a licensee or authorized delegate.
(b) There is hereby imposed an excise tax of twenty percent on any
-3-

LB1174 LB1174
2026 2026
remittance transfer by a licensee or authorized delegate to a resident of
a foreign adversary country.
(c) The tax imposed in subdivisions (2)(a) and (b) of this section
shall not apply to any remittance transfer if the sender or designated
recipient is an active duty member of the armed forces or a dependent of
such member.
(d) To qualify for the exemption under subdivision (2)(c) of this
section, the sender or designated recipient shall present a valid United
States Department of Defense Common Access Card or other valid military
identification to the remittance transfer provider at the time of the
transaction.
(3)(a) The sender of a remittance transfer shall pay the tax imposed
by this section on such transfer.
(b) If any tax imposed by this section is not paid at the time a
transfer is made, then to the extent that such tax is not paid, the
remittance transfer provider of such transfer shall pay the tax.
(c) The remittance transfer provider of a remittance transfer shall
collect the amount of the tax imposed by this section on such transfer
from the sender and remit such tax to the Department of Revenue
quarterly.
(4) Sections 77-2707 to 77-2711 shall apply to the tax imposed by
this section as if such tax were a sales or use tax imposed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.
(5) The Department of Revenue may share any information related to
the tax imposed by this section with the Department of Banking and
Finance.
(6)(a) No refund of the tax imposed by this section shall be allowed
unless a claim for such refund is filed within the required period for a
refund of sales taxes.
(b) The Department of Revenue shall establish an expedited refund
process for any active duty member of the armed forces or dependent who
-4-

LB1174 LB1174
2026 2026
was charged the tax in error.
(c) To be eligible for the expedited refund process described in
subdivision (6)(b) of this section, an active duty member of the armed
forces or dependent who was charged in error shall submit proof of
military status to the Department of Revenue.
(7) The Department of Revenue may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to prescribe any and all forms and supporting documentation
necessary for the payment, collection, and reporting of the tax imposed
by this section to establish the expedited refund process described in
subdivision (6)(b) of this section.
(8) The Department of Revenue may use electronic funds transfer to
collect the tax imposed by this section or to pay any refund of such tax.
(9) The use of any electronic filing of documents or electronic
funds transfer shall not alter the rights of any party from the rights of
such party if a different method of filing or payment was used.
(10) All taxes received by the Department of Revenue pursuant to
this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
General Fund.
(11) Upon request from the Department of Revenue, the Department of
Banking and Finance may make a claim against the surety bond of a
licensee for payment of any tax imposed under this section on such
licensee.
Sec. 4. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 5. Original sections 8-2701 and 8-2718, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 6. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-5-